API/spylls/examples/si_LK.aff
FLAG num
SFX 23 Y 57
SFX 23 0 ා   .
SFX 23 0 ාත්   .
SFX 23 0 ායි   .
SFX 23 0 ෙක්  .
SFX 23 0 ෙකුත්  .
SFX 23 0 ෙකි  .
SFX 23 0 ෙකු  .
SFX 23 0 කු  .
SFX 23 0 කුත්  .
SFX 23 0 කුයි  .
SFX 23 0 ාට  .
SFX 23 0 ාටත්  .
SFX 23 0 ාටයි  .
SFX 23 0 ෙකුට  .
SFX 23 0 ෙකුටත්  .
SFX 23 0 ෙකුටයි  .
SFX 23 0 කුට  .
SFX 23 0 කුටත්  .
SFX 23 0 කුටයි  .
SFX 23 0 ාගෙන්  .
SFX 23 0 ාගෙනුත්  .
SFX 23 0 ාගෙනි  .
SFX 23 0 ෙකුගෙන්  .
SFX 23 0 ෙකුගෙනුත්  .
SFX 23 0 ෙකුගෙනි  .
SFX 23 0 කුගෙන්  .
SFX 23 0 කුගෙනුත්  .
SFX 23 0 කුගෙනි  .
SFX 23 0 ාගේ  .
SFX 23 0 ාගේත්  .
SFX 23 0 ාගේයි  .
SFX 23 0 ගෙ  .
SFX 23 0 ගෙත්  .
SFX 23 0 ගෙයි  .
SFX 23 0 ෙකුගේ  .
SFX 23 0 ෙකුගේත්  .
SFX 23 0 ෙකුගේයි  .
SFX 23 0 කුගේ  .
SFX 23 0 කුගේත්  .
SFX 23 0 කුගේයි  .
SFX 23 0 ා  .
SFX 23 0 ෝ   .
SFX 23 0 ෝත්   .
SFX 23 0 ෝයි   .
SFX 23 0 න්   .
SFX 23 0 නුත්   .
SFX 23 0 නි   .
SFX 23 0 න්ට  .
SFX 23 0 න්ටත්  .
SFX 23 0 න්ටයි  .
SFX 23 0 න්ගෙන්  .
SFX 23 0 න්ගෙනුත්  .
SFX 23 0 න්ගෙනි  .
SFX 23 0 න්ගේ  .
SFX 23 0 න්ගේත්  .
SFX 23 0 න්ගේයි  .
SFX 23 0 නි  .
SFX 24 Y 46
SFX 24 0 ා   .
SFX 24 0 ාත්   .
SFX 24 0 ායි   .
SFX 24 0 ෙක්  .
SFX 24 0 ෙකුත්  .
SFX 24 0 ෙකි  .
SFX 24 0 ෙකු  .
SFX 24 0 ෙකුයි  .
SFX 24 0 ාට  .
SFX 24 0 ාටත්  .
SFX 24 0 ාටයි  .
SFX 24 0 ෙකුට  .
SFX 24 0 ෙකුටත්  .
SFX 24 0 ෙකුටයි  .
SFX 24 0 ාගෙන්  .
SFX 24 0 ාගෙනුත්  .
SFX 24 0 ාගෙනි  .
SFX 24 0 ෙකුගෙන්  .
SFX 24 0 ෙකුගෙනුත්  .
SFX 24 0 ෙකුගෙනි  .
SFX 24 0 ාගේ  .
SFX 24 0 ාගේත්  .
SFX 24 0 ාගේයි  .
SFX 24 0 ාගෙ  .
SFX 24 0 ාගෙත්  .
SFX 24 0 ාගෙයි  .
SFX 24 0 ෙකුගේ  .
SFX 24 0 ෙකුගේත්  .
SFX 24 0 ෙකුගේයි  .
SFX 24 0 ෝ   .
SFX 24 0 ු   .
SFX 24 0 ුත්   .
SFX 24 0 ුයි   .
SFX 24 0 ුන්   .
SFX 24 0 ුනුත්   .
SFX 24 0 ුනි   .
SFX 24 0 ුන්ට  .
SFX 24 0 ුන්ටත්  .
SFX 24 0 ුන්ටයි  .
SFX 24 0 ුන්ගෙන්  .
SFX 24 0 ුන්ගෙනුත්  .
SFX 24 0 ුන්ගෙනි  .
SFX 24 0  ුන්ගේ  .
SFX 24 0  ුන්ගේත්  .
SFX 24 0  ුන්ගේයි  .
SFX 24 0 ුනි  .
SFX 25 Y 46
SFX 25 0 යා  .
SFX 25 0 යාත්   .
SFX 25 0 යායි   .
SFX 25 0 යෙක්  .
SFX 25 0 යෙකුත්  .
SFX 25 0 යෙකි  .
SFX 25 0 යෙකු  .
SFX 25 0 යෙකුයි  .
SFX 25 0 යාට  .
SFX 25 0 යාටත්  .
SFX 25 0 යාටයි  .
SFX 25 0 යෙකුට  .
SFX 25 0 යෙකුටත්  .
SFX 25 0 යෙකුටයි  .
SFX 25 0 යාගෙන්  .
SFX 25 0 යාගෙනුත්  .
SFX 25 0 යාගෙනි  .
SFX 25 0 යෙකුගෙන්  .
SFX 25 0 යෙකුගෙනුත්  .
SFX 25 0 යෙකුගෙනි  .
SFX 25 0 යාගේ  .
SFX 25 0 යාගේත්  .
SFX 25 0 යාගේයි  .
SFX 25 0 යගෙ  .
SFX 25 0 යගෙත්  .
SFX 25 0 යගෙයි  .
SFX 25 0 යෙකුගේ  .
SFX 25 0 යෙකුගේත්  .
SFX 25 0 යෙකුගේයි  .
SFX 25 0 යො  .
SFX 25 0 ු   .
SFX 25 0 ුත්   .
SFX 25 0 ුයි   .
SFX 25 0 ුන්   .
SFX 25 0 ුනුත්   .
SFX 25 0 ුනි   .
SFX 25 0 ුන්ට  .
SFX 25 0 ුන්ටත්  .
SFX 25 0 ුන්ටයි  .
SFX 25 0 ුන්ගෙන්  .
SFX 25 0 ුන්ගෙනුත්  .
SFX 25 0 ුන්ගෙනි  .
SFX 25 0 ුන්ගේ  .
SFX 25 0 ුන්ගේත්  .
SFX 25 0 ුන්ගේයි  .
SFX 25 0 ුනි  .
SFX 26 Y 40
SFX 26 0 ව  .
SFX 26 0 වත්  .
SFX 26 0 වක්  .
SFX 26 0 වකුත්  .
SFX 26 0 වකි  .
SFX 26 0 වෙන්  .
SFX 26 0 වෙනුත්  .
SFX 26 0 වෙනි  .
SFX 26 0 වකින්  .
SFX 26 0 වකිනුත්  .
SFX 26 0 වකිනි  .
SFX 26 0 වට  .
SFX 26 0 වටත්  .
SFX 26 0 වටයි  .
SFX 26 0 වකට  .
SFX 26 0 වකටත්  .
SFX 26 0 වකටයි  .
SFX 26 0 වේ  .
SFX 26 0 වේත්  .
SFX 26 0 වේයි  .
SFX 26 0 වෙ  .
SFX 26 0 වෙත්  .
SFX 26 0 වෙයි  .
SFX 26 0 වක  .
SFX 26 0 වකත්  .
SFX 26 0 වකයි  .
SFX 26 0 වෙහි  .
SFX 26 0 වෙහිත්  .
SFX 26 0 වෙහියි  .
SFX 26 0 ත්  .
SFX 26 0 යි  .
SFX 26 0 වලින්  .
SFX 26 0 වලිනුත්  .
SFX 26 0 වලිනි  .
SFX 26 0 වලට  .
SFX 26 0 වලටත්  .
SFX 26 0 වලටයි  .
SFX 26 0 වල  .
SFX 26 0 වලත්  .
SFX 26 0 වලයි  .
SFX 27 Y 41
SFX 27 0 ්  .
SFX 27 0 ත්  .
SFX 27 0 යි  .
SFX 27 0 ක්  .
SFX 27 0 කුත්  .
SFX 27 0 කි  .
SFX 27 0 ෙන්  .
SFX 27 0 ෙනුත්  .
SFX 27 0 ෙනි  .
SFX 27 0 කින්  .
SFX 27 0 කිනුත්  .
SFX 27 0 කිනි  .
SFX 27 0 ට  .
SFX 27 0 ටත්  .
SFX 27 0 ටයි  .
SFX 27 0 කට  .
SFX 27 0 කටත්  .
SFX 27 0 කටයි  .
SFX 27 0 ේ  .
SFX 27 0 ේත්  .
SFX 27 0 ේයි  .
SFX 27 0 ෙ  .
SFX 27 0 ෙත්  .
SFX 27 0 ෙයි  .
SFX 27 0 ක  .
SFX 27 0 කත්  .
SFX 27 0 කයි  .
SFX 27 0 ෙහි  .
SFX 27 0 ෙහිත්  .
SFX 27 0 ෙහියි  .
SFX 27 0 ුත්  .
SFX 27 0  ුයි  .
SFX 27 0 ්වලින්  .
SFX 27 0 ්වලිනුත්  .
SFX 27 0 ්වලිනි  .
SFX 27 0 ්වලට  .
SFX 27 0 ්වලටත්  .
SFX 27 0 ්වලටයි  .
SFX 27 0 ්වල  .
SFX 27 0 ්වලත්  .
SFX 27 0 ්වලයි  .
SFX 28 Y 64
SFX 28 0 ය  .
SFX 28 0 යත්  .
SFX 28 0 යයි  .
SFX 28 0 ේ  .
SFX 28 0 ෙ  .
SFX 28 0 ෙත්  .
SFX 28 0 ෙයි  .
SFX 28 0 යක්  .
SFX 28 0 යන්  .
SFX 28 0 යකුත්  .
SFX 28 0 යකි  .
SFX 28 0 යෙන්  .
SFX 28 0 යෙනුත්  .
SFX 28 0 යෙනි  .
SFX 28 0 ෙන්  .
SFX 28 0 ෙනුත්  .
SFX 28 0 ෙනි  .
SFX 28 0 යකින්  .
SFX 28 0 යකිනුත්  .
SFX 28 0 යකිනි  .
SFX 28 0 ෙකින්  .
SFX 28 0 ෙකිනුත්  .
SFX 28 0 ෙකිනි  .
SFX 28 0 යට  .
SFX 28 0 යටත්  .
SFX 28 0 යටයි  .
SFX 28 0 ෙට  .
SFX 28 0 ෙටත්  .
SFX 28 0 ෙටයි  .
SFX 28 0 යකට  .
SFX 28 0 යකටත්  .
SFX 28 0 යකටයි  .
SFX 28 0 ෙකට  .
SFX 28 0 ෙකටත්  .
SFX 28 0 ෙකටයි  .
SFX 28 0 යේ  .
SFX 28 0 යේත්  .
SFX 28 0 යේයි  .
SFX 28 0 යෙ  .
SFX 28 0 යෙත්  .
SFX 28 0 යෙයි  .
SFX 28 0 යක  .
SFX 28 0 යකත්  .
SFX 28 0 යකයි  .
SFX 28 0 ෙක  .
SFX 28 0 ෙකත්  .
SFX 28 0 ෙකයි  .
SFX 28 0 යෙහි  .
SFX 28 0 යෙහිත්  .
SFX 28 0 යෙහියි  .
SFX 28 0 ෙහි  .
SFX 28 0 ෙහිත්  .
SFX 28 0 ෙහියි  .
SFX 28 0 ත්  .
SFX 28 0 යි  .
SFX 28 0 වලින්  .
SFX 28 0 වලිනුත්  .
SFX 28 0 වලිනි  .
SFX 28 0 වලට  .
SFX 28 0 වලටත්  .
SFX 28 0 වලටයි  .
SFX 28 0 වල  .
SFX 28 0 වලත්  .
SFX 28 0 වලයි  .
SFX 29 Y 44
SFX 29 0 ත්  .
SFX 29 0 යි  .
SFX 29 0 ේ  .
SFX 29 0 ෙ  .
SFX 29 0 ෙත්  .
SFX 29 0 ෙයි  .
SFX 29 0 ක්  .
SFX 29 0 න්  .
SFX 29 0 කුත්  .
SFX 29 0 කි  .
SFX 29 0 ෙන්  .
SFX 29 0 ෙනුත්  .
SFX 29 0 ෙනි  .
SFX 29 0 කින්  .
SFX 29 0 කිනුත්  .
SFX 29 0 කිනි  .
SFX 29 0 ට  .
SFX 29 0 ටත්  .
SFX 29 0 ටයි  .
SFX 29 0 ෙට  .
SFX 29 0 ෙටත්  .
SFX 29 0 ෙටයි  .
SFX 29 0 කට  .
SFX 29 0 කටත්  .
SFX 29 0 කටයි  .
SFX 29 0 ක  .
SFX 29 0 කත්  .
SFX 29 0 කයි  .
SFX 29 0 ෙක  .
SFX 29 0 ෙකත්  .
SFX 29 0 ෙකයි  .
SFX 29 0 ෙහි  .
SFX 29 0 ෙහිත්  .
SFX 29 0 ෙහියි  .
SFX 29 0 ත්  .
SFX 29 0 ලින්  .
SFX 29 0 ලිනුත්  .
SFX 29 0 ලිනි  .
SFX 29 0 ලට  .
SFX 29 0 ලටත්  .
SFX 29 0 ලටයි  .
SFX 29 0 ල  .
SFX 29 0 ලත්  .
SFX 29 0 ලයි  .
SFX 30 Y 56
SFX 30 0 ය  .
SFX 30 0 යත්  .
SFX 30 0 යයි  .
SFX 30 0 ේ  .
SFX 30 0 ේත්  .
SFX 30 0 ේයි  .
SFX 30 0 යක්  .
SFX 30 0 යකුත්  .
SFX 30 0 යකි  .
SFX 30 0 යෙන්  .
SFX 30 0 යෙනුත්  .
SFX 30 0 යෙනි  .
SFX 30 0 ෙන්  .
SFX 30 0 ෙනුත්  .
SFX 30 0 ෙනි  .
SFX 30 0 යකින්  .
SFX 30 0 යකිනුත්  .
SFX 30 0 යකිනි  .
SFX 30 0 ේකින්  .
SFX 30 0 ේකිනුත්  .
SFX 30 0 ේකිනි  .
SFX 30 0 යට  .
SFX 30 0 යටත්  .
SFX 30 0 යටයි  .
SFX 30 0 ේට  .
SFX 30 0 ේටත්  .
SFX 30 0 ේටයි  .
SFX 30 0 යකට  .
SFX 30 0 යකටත්  .
SFX 30 0 යකටයි  .
SFX 30 0 ේකට  .
SFX 30 0 ේකටත්  .
SFX 30 0 ේකටයි  .
SFX 30 0 යේ  .
SFX 30 0 යේත්  .
SFX 30 0 යේයි  .
SFX 30 0 යෙ  .
SFX 30 0 යෙත්  .
SFX 30 0 යෙයි  .
SFX 30 0 ෙ  .
SFX 30 0 ෙත්  .
SFX 30 0 ෙයි  .
SFX 30 0 ේක  .
SFX 30 0 ේකත්  .
SFX 30 0 ේකයි  .
SFX 30 0 ත්  .
SFX 30 0 යි  .
SFX 30 0 වලින්  .
SFX 30 0 වලිනුත්  .
SFX 30 0 වලිනි  .
SFX 30 0 වලට  .
SFX 30 0 වලටත්  .
SFX 30 0 වලටයි  .
SFX 30 0 වල  .
SFX 30 0 වලත්  .
SFX 30 0 වලයි  .
SFX 31 Y 44
SFX 31 0 ත්  .
SFX 31 0 යි  .
SFX 31 0 ක්  .
SFX 31 0 කුත්  .
SFX 31 0 කි  .
SFX 31 0 ෙන්  .
SFX 31 0 ෙනුත්  .
SFX 31 0 ෙනි  .
SFX 31 0 ින්  .
SFX 31 0 ිනුත්  .
SFX 31 0 ිනි  .
SFX 31 0 කින්  .
SFX 31 0 කිනුත්  .
SFX 31 0 කිනි  .
SFX 31 0 ට  .
SFX 31 0 ටත්  .
SFX 31 0 ටයි  .
SFX 31 0 කට  .
SFX 31 0 කටත්  .
SFX 31 0 කටයි  .
SFX 31 0 ේ  .
SFX 31 0 ේත්  .
SFX 31 0 ේයි  .
SFX 31 0 ‌ෙ  .
SFX 31 0 ෙත්  .
SFX 31 0 ෙයි  .
SFX 31 0 ක  .
SFX 31 0 කත්  .
SFX 31 0 කයි  .
SFX 31 0 ෙහි  .
SFX 31 0 ෙහිත්  .
SFX 31 0 ෙහියි  .
SFX 31 0 වල්  .
SFX 31 0 වලුත්  .
SFX 31 0 වලුයි  .
SFX 31 0 වලින්  .
SFX 31 0 වලිනුත්  .
SFX 31 0 වලිනි  .
SFX 31 0 වලට  .
SFX 31 0 වලටත්  .
SFX 31 0 වලටයි  .
SFX 31 0 වල  .
SFX 31 0 වලත්  .
SFX 31 0 වලයි  .
