API/spylls/examples/si_LK.dic
අගමැතිතුම/23
අගවිනිසුරුතුම/23
අග්‍රවිනිශ්චයකාරතුම/23
අදිකාරම්තුම/23
අධ්‍යක්ෂතුම/23
අධ්‍යක්‍ෂතුම/23
ආචාර්යතුම/23
ආණ්ඩුකාරතුම/23
ආදිපාදතුම/23
ඇදුරුතුම/23
ඇමතිතුම/23
උතුම/23
එතුම/23
කථානායකතුම/23
ගුරුතුම/23
ජෙනරාල්තුම/23
ජනාධිපතිතුම/23
තුම/23
නායකතුම/23
පඬිතුම/23
පියතුම/23
පූජකතුම/23
මන්ත්‍රීතුම/23
මැතිතුම/23
මුදලිතුම/23
රජතුම/23
විද්‍යාලයාධිපතිතුම/23
විනිශ්චයකාරතුම/23
විපක්ෂනායකතුම/23
විපක්‍ෂනායකතුම/23
හමුදාපතිතුම/23
ඇත්ත/23
දෙන/23
දෙදෙන/23
ඔබතුම/23
අංකීර/24
අඩවියදර/24
අන්වේෂ්ට/24
අමුතුතෙර/24
ඇජරතෙර/24
උවට/24
එඩේර/24
ඕඞ්ඩ/24
කගවෙසණ/24
කගවේණ/24
කඟවේණ/24
කණ/24
කින්නර/24
කුමර/24
කොට/24
කොර/24
ගවර/24
ගුඞ්ඩ/24
ගුර/24
ජුණ්ඩ/24
තවසර/24
තිසර/24
තෝර/24
දෙබර/24
නටරාජ/24
පල්හොර/24
පවිට/24
බක්කර/24
බට්ට/24
බමර/24
බඹර/24
බිහිර/24
මකර/24
මොනර/24
මෝර/24
රාගුඞ්ඩ/24
රෙහෙර/24
රේර/24
ලෙඩ/24
වල්සොර/24
විනිසුර/24
විල්මොනර/24
සගමහණ/24
සතරකර/24
සැට්ටර/24
සිත්තර/24
සිවුරුහොර/24
සුරාසොඬ/24
සෙබළ/24
සොකර/24
සොඬ/24
සොර/24
හාල්දණ්ඩ/24
හෙරණ/24
හොර/24
මහණ/24
අධ්‍යක්ෂවර/25
අධිනීතිඥවර/25
අධිපතිවර/25
අපෝස්තුලුවර/25
අමාත්‍යවර/25
ආඥාපතිවර/25
ඇමතිවර/25
ඉන්දියන්වර/25
කර්තෘවර/25
කළමනාකාරවර/25
කොමියුනිස්ට්වර/25
ග්‍රාමසේවකවර/25
ගුරුවර/25
තානාපතිවර/25
දොස්තරවර/25
නාහිමිවර/25
පඬිවර/25
ප්‍රධානාචාර්යවර/25
ප්‍රමුඛාචාර්යවර/25
මන්ත්‍රීවර/25
මහත්වර/25
මහාචාර්යවර/25
මුදලිවර/25
රදලවර/25
ලුතිනන්වර/25
ලේකම්වර/25
විදුහල්පතිවර/25
වෛද්‍යවර/25
ශල්‍යවෛද්‍යවර/25
සභාපතිවර/25
සිටුවර/25
ඍෂිවර/25
හිමිවර/25
අගාලූ/26
අණු/26
අත්‍යුත්සන්නතා/26
අනුකථා/26
අනෝරා/26
අප්පිරියා/26
අරටු/26
අවබෝධතා/26
අසාමාන්‍යතා/26
ආරක්ෂා/26
ඇමීබයසියා/26
ඉණිපෝරු/26
ඉස්පාසු/26
උත්පේ‍්‍රක්ෂා/26
උල්කා/26
ඔංචිල්ලා/26
ඕරප්පු/26
කණ/26
කමා/26
කසුකුසු/26
කැරකොප්පු/26
කුළම්බු/26
කොන්කෝටු/26
කොළඹු/26
ගගනගංගා/26
ගර්ජනා/26
ගැලවිජ්ජා/26
ගේලියා/26
චන්ද්‍රිකා/26
ඡුායා/26
ජලවායු/26
ඣම්පට්ටශාලා/26
තක්සේරු/26
තලප්පා/26
තැව්/26
තුරුණු/26
දාදු/26
දොයිතු/26
නිත්‍යතා/26
පටීධාතු/26
පහන්කූඩු/26
පෙරටු/26
ප‍්‍රාර්ථනා/26
බෝක්කු/26
මස්තුවිද්‍යා/26
මුරපේරු/26
රංගු/26
රැකියා/26
ලැජ්ජා/26
වඩක්කු/26
වාග්මාලා/26
විද්‍යුදණු/26
වෙල්ලා/26
ශූන්‍යතා/26
සජ්ජා/26
සමු/26
සැන්දෑ/26
සුමුළු/26
සෝලූ/26
හිමාංශු/26
අඩුලුහුඬුකම/27
අත්විඳුම/27
අමාඵල/27
අසිපත/27
ඇටවුම/27
ඇරලුම/27
ඉකිබිඳුම/27
ඉරණම/27
උච්චායම/27
එකත්පස/27
ඔප්නැංවුම/27
කන්විත/27
කාබාන/27
කෑරීම/27
කුස/27
කොඬොල/27
ගඳවස/27
ගැනුම/27
ගිරිකුල/27
ගොස/27
තප්පුලීම/27
තැළුම/27
තෙස/27
දාගබ/27
දියපත/27
දුර්වලකම/27
නඩලම/27
නැළවීම/27
නිවාලුම/27
පතැස/27
පහිණපත/27
පැල්ම/27
පිපිරුම/27
පිහීම/27
පෙරවදන/27
බත්පත/27
බිණීම/27
මගපල/27
මළහදවත/27
මිදුල/27
මූනිස්සම/27
යොජුන/27
රැකීම/27
ලණුපදම/27
ලොග/27
වපරැස/27
වායාම/27
වැරදුම/27
විදුපියස/27
විළිරෑන/27
ශිරස/27
සම/27
සැණෙලීම/27
සිතුවම/27
සුබසෙත/27
සෝන/27
හැඬලුම/27
හිතුම/27
අග්‍රෝපස්ථාන/28
අතෘප්ති/28
අධෝභාග/28
අනන්‍යතාව/29
හීනතාව/29
සම්බන්ධතාව/29
අනුගීති/28
අනුසාර/28
අපගුරුත්වාවර්තන/28
අභිතාප/28
අමෘෂාවාද/28
අවකාර/28
අව්‍යාජත්ව/28
ආගණක/28
ආපාදන/28
ආවේණි/28
ඉටිග‍්‍රන්ථි/28
උච්චාටන/28
උදරාධ්මාන/28
උපපාත/28
උරුම/28
ඒකාවලි/28
කඩක්ක්ර/28
කරවැහැ/28
කාම/28
කුංචන/28
කෘමිනාශක/28
කෝපාග්නි/28
ක්ෂුර/28
ගමන/28
ගැලරි/28
චක්ෂුප‍්‍රසාද/28
ජම්බාලි/28
ණයකර/28
තුවා/28
දුමාර/28
ධර්මතාව/29
ප්‍රවණතාව/29
නාදමාන/28
නැඹුරුතාව/29
සමතුලිතතාව/29
නිවැරදිභාව/28
නිශ්ශබ්දතාව/29
පරමණ්ඩල/28
පාරචෝපන/28
පෝෂණ/28
ප‍්‍රභව/28
බන්ධක/28
භූතල/28
මාත‍්‍රාහානි/28
මෝහන/28
රම්භ/28
රේසර/28
වටන්හල්ගෙ/28
වාච්‍යාර්ථ/28
විඥප්ති/28
විවර්ෂණ/28
වෛවර්ණ/28
ශාස්ත‍්‍ර/28
සංකූලතාව/29
සංඝරත්න/28
සදාචාරධර්ම/28
සමතුලිතතාව/29
සමායෝජන/28
සාක්කි/28
සුභාරංචි/28
සුහදතාව/29
ස්පැරෝමීටර/28
හිරුස්ඵාර/28
අඩ/30
අත්බව/30
අතීත/30
අධ්‍යයන/30
අධිකරණ/30
අන්ධකාර/30
අනුකරණ/30
අනුක්‍රම/30
අපනයන/30
අභිචාර/30
අභිසමාචාර/30
අඹ/30
අර්බුද/30
අවතාර/30
අවහිර/30
ආඝාත/30
ආණ්ඩුක්‍රම/30
ආත්මෝපහාර/30
ආදේශ/30
ආධ්‍යාත්ම/30
ආනිශංස/30
ආබාධ/30
ආයෝජන/30
ආර්ථික/30
ආවේග/30
උත්තමාචාර/30
උදාහරණ/30
ඒකාධිකාර/30
කට්ටල/30
කඹ/30
කරදර/30
කාමර/30
කැට/30
ජනමත/30
තල/30
තාල/30
දඩ/30
දේශපාලන/30
නිගමන/30
ප්‍රාන්ත/30
බෝල/30
මාස/30
රාග/30
ලිපිලේඛන/30
ලෝක/30
වනාත්තර/30
වැඩ/30
ශරීර/30
සේල/30
හිර/30
හොර/30
එදින/30
ලෝක/30
උද/30
ප්‍රතිකාර/30
එජාප/30
ආමන්ත්‍රණ/30
ප්‍රකාශන/30
අගනුවර/31
අග්ගිහ/31
අටපිරිකර/31
අඩහ/31
අතමිට/31
අතුරොද/31
අදන්මඟ/31
අරණ/31
අහ/31
ඇලඹ/31
ඉතිගැට/31
ඉහ/31
උතුකඩ/31
උල්දියර/31
එගොඩහ/31
ඔට/31
කටවහර/31
කඳපිළිවෙළ/31
කහ්ලාර/31
කුණුකසළ/31
කොක්හඬ/31
ගංගොඩ/31
ගනඹ/31
ගල්පිට/31
ගැල්නැඹ/31
ගිරිදොළ/31
ගොවද/31
තනපට/31
තවඩම්වැළ/31
තිරපට/31
තෙවට/31
දලබුද/31
දිට/31
දුමරද/31
දෙවන්මිණ/31
නාගදරණ/31
නිවුඞ්ඩ/31
නොහොඳ/31
පස්දොර/31
පිටරට/31
පෙරදිග/31
බර/31
බෙහෙද/31
මහ/31
මින්රද/31
මෙර/31
යමාමහපෙළහර/31
රහසඟ/31
ලියතොරණ/31
වනරොද/31
වවුල්පළ/31
වැළමිට/31
වෙදඟ/31
සතර/31
සිබිඞ්ඩ/31
සෙළ/31
හිණකඩ/31
වැඩ/31
